Utah statutes.
58-50-10.   Exceptions from licensure.

In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following persons may engage in probation supervision services subject to the stated circumstances and limitations without being licensed under this chapter:

(1)  employees of the Department of Corrections while performing probation services as part of their normal duties and responsibilities;

(2)  members of the armed forces and employees, agents, or representatives of the federal government while acting in their official capacity; and

(3)  agencies of local government, pursuant to Section 77-18-1.

